District of Columbia statutes.
8-2103.05

Rodent harborage prohibited.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any person to cause or permit the accumulation of debris on public or private property or cause or permit weeds or grass to grow to a height of 8 inches or more on private property which they own.

(b)

Upon the transfer or change in occupancy of any real property, the owner of the property shall inspect the property for signs of rodent harborage. If signs of past rodent harborage are found, all rodent entryways shall be sealed with hardware cloth or another appropriate material to prevent re-infestation. If an active infestation is found, all rodent entryways shall be sealed with hardware cloth or other appropriate material, and the infestation shall be abated.

(c)

Any person violating subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall abate the condition causing rodent harborage within 14 days of notification of the violation from the Mayor. Any abatement of existing rodent populations shall be performed by a licensed and certified pest controller. Any person who fails to abate the condition causing rodent harborage shall be liable to arrest and upon conviction shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine for each offense not to exceed $10,000, or shall be imprisoned for a period not to exceed 90 days, or both, in the discretion of the court.

(d)

Civil fines, penalties and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of this subtitle, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this subchapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infractions shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 908, 47 DCR 6308
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 902 to 908 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to Title IX of D.C. Law 13-172, the “Rodent Control Act of 2000”, see Mayor’s Order 2001-21, February 2, 2001 ( 48 DCR 1362).